Illinois, session 104th, HB266.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Insurance Claims Fraud Prevention Act is 5amended by changing Section 1 as follows: 6    (740 ILCS 92/1)7    Sec. 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the the 8Insurance Claims Fraud Prevention Act.9(Source: P.A. 92-233, eff. 1-1-02.)